Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.050

Waiver of right to object.

A party who knows that any provision of this chapter from which the parties may derogate or any requirement under the arbitration agreement has not been complied with and yet proceeds with the arbitration without stating the party's objection to such noncompliance without undue delay or, if a time limit is provided therefore, within such period of time, shall be deemed to have waived the party's right to object.

[ 2015 c 276 s 5.]